California statutes. Water Code
(a) Prior to initiating the development of a groundwater sustainability plan, the groundwater sustainability agency shall make available to the public and the department a written statement describing the manner in which interested parties may participate in the development and implementation of the groundwater sustainability plan. The groundwater sustainability agency shall provide the written statement to the legislative body of any city, county, or city and county located within the geographic area to be covered by the plan. The groundwater sustainability agency may appoint and consult with an advisory committee consisting of interested parties for the purposes of developing and implementing a groundwater sustainability plan. The groundwater sustainability agency shall encourage the active involvement of diverse social,
 cultural, and economic elements of the population within the groundwater basin prior to and during the development and implementation of the groundwater sustainability plan. If the geographic area to be covered by the plan includes a public water system regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, the groundwater sustainability agency shall provide the written statement to the commission.

(b) For purposes of this section, interested parties include entities listed in Section 10927 that are monitoring and reporting groundwater elevations in all or a part of a groundwater basin managed by the groundwater sustainability agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 666, Sec. 5.   (AB 617)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10728.

On the April 1 following the adoption of a groundwater sustainability plan and annually thereafter, a groundwater sustainability agency shall submit a report to the department containing the following information about the basin managed in the groundwater sustainability plan:

(a) Groundwater elevation data.

(b) Annual aggregated data identifying groundwater extraction for the preceding water year.

(c) Surface water supply used for or available for use for groundwater recharge or in-lieu use.

(d) Total water use.

(e) Change in groundwater storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10728.2.

A groundwater sustainability agency shall periodically evaluate its groundwater sustainability plan, assess changing conditions in the basin that may warrant modification of the plan or management objectives, and may adjust components in the plan. An evaluation of the plan shall focus on determining whether the actions under the plan are meeting the plan’s management objectives and whether those objectives are meeting the sustainability goal in the basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10728.4.

A groundwater sustainability agency may adopt or amend a groundwater sustainability plan after a public hearing, held at least 90 days after providing notice to a city or county within the area of the proposed plan or amendment. The groundwater sustainability agency shall review and consider comments from any city or county that receives notice pursuant to this section and shall consult with a city or county that requests consultation within 30 days of receipt of the notice. Nothing in this section is intended to preclude an agency and a city or county from otherwise consulting or commenting regarding the adoption or amendment of a plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10728.6.

Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to the preparation and adoption of plans pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this part shall be interpreted as exempting from Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code a project that would implement actions taken pursuant to a plan adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Technical Assistance [10729. - 10729.2.]

10729.

(a) The department or a groundwater sustainability agency may provide technical assistance to entities that extract or use groundwater to promote water conservation and protect groundwater resources.

(b) The department may provide technical assistance to any groundwater sustainability agency in response to that agency’s request for assistance in the development and implementation of a groundwater sustainability plan. The department shall use its best efforts to provide the requested assistance.

(c) The department shall prepare and publish a report by December 31, 2016, on its Internet Web site that presents the department’s best estimate,
 based on available information, of water available for replenishment of groundwater in the state.

(d) (1) By January 1, 2017, the department shall publish on its Internet Web site best management practices for the sustainable management of groundwater.

(2) The department shall develop the best management practices through a public process involving one public meeting conducted at a location in northern California, one public meeting conducted at a location in the San Joaquin Valley, one public meeting conducted at a location in southern California, and one public meeting of the California Water Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 15.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10729.2.

With the exception of regulations required by Sections 10722.2 and 10733.2, a guideline, criterion, bulletin, or other technical or procedural analysis or guidance prepared by the department as required by this part is not subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 11.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Financial Authority [10730. - 10731.]

10730.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency may impose fees, including, but not limited to, permit fees and fees on groundwater extraction or other regulated activity, to fund the costs of a groundwater sustainability program, including, but not limited to, preparation, adoption, and amendment of a groundwater sustainability plan, and investigations, inspections, compliance assistance, enforcement, and program administration, including a prudent reserve. A groundwater sustainability agency shall not impose a fee pursuant to this subdivision on a de minimis extractor unless the agency has regulated the users pursuant to this part.

(b) (1) Prior to imposing or increasing a fee, a
 groundwater sustainability agency shall hold at least one public meeting, at which oral or written presentations may be made as part of the meeting.

(2) Notice of the time and place of the meeting shall include a general explanation of the matter to be considered and a statement that the data required by this section is available. The notice shall be provided by publication pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, by posting notice on the Internet Web site of the groundwater sustainability agency, and by mail to any interested party who files a written request with the agency for mailed notice of the meeting on new or increased fees. A written request for mailed notices shall be valid for one year from the date that the request is made and may be renewed by making a written request on or before April 1 of each year.

(3) At least 20 days prior to the meeting, the groundwater sustainability agency shall make available to the public data upon which the proposed fee is based.

(c) Any action by a groundwater sustainability agency to impose or increase a fee shall be taken only by ordinance or resolution.

(d) (1) As an alternative method for the collection of fees imposed pursuant to this section, a groundwater sustainability agency may adopt a resolution requesting collection of the fees in the same manner as ordinary municipal ad valorem taxes.

(2) A resolution described in paragraph (1) shall be adopted and furnished to the county auditor-controller and board
 of supervisors on or before August 1 of each year that the alternative collection of the fees is being requested. The resolution shall include a list of parcels and the amount to be collected for each parcel.

(e) The power granted by this section is in addition to any powers a groundwater sustainability agency has under any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 667, Sec. 2.   (AB 939)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10730.1.

A groundwater sustainability agency, before imposing or increasing a fee pursuant to Section 10730 or 10730.2 relating to a groundwater basin that includes a water corporation regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, shall notify the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   (AB 2874)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10730.2.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency that adopts a groundwater sustainability plan pursuant to this part may impose fees on the extraction of groundwater from the basin to fund costs of groundwater management, including, but not limited to, the costs of the following:

(1) Administration, operation, and maintenance, including a prudent reserve.

(2) Acquisition of lands or other property, facilities, and services.

(3) Supply, production, treatment, or distribution of water.

(4) Other activities necessary or convenient to
 implement the plan.

(b) Until a groundwater sustainability plan is adopted pursuant to this part, a local agency may impose fees in accordance with the procedures provided in this section for the purposes of Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) as long as a groundwater management plan adopted before January 1, 2015, is in effect.

(c) Fees imposed pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution.

(d) Fees imposed pursuant to this section may include fixed fees and fees charged on a volumetric basis, including, but not limited to, fees that increase based on the quantity of groundwater produced annually, the year in which the production of groundwater commenced from a groundwater extraction facility, and impacts to
 the basin.

(e) The power granted by this section is in addition to any powers a groundwater sustainability agency has under any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 12.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10730.4.

A groundwater sustainability agency may fund activities pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) and may impose fees pursuant to Section 10730.2 to fund activities undertaken by the agency pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 16.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10730.6.

(a) A groundwater fee levied pursuant to this chapter shall be due and payable to the groundwater sustainability agency by each owner or operator on a day established by the groundwater sustainability agency.

(b) If an owner or operator knowingly fails to pay a groundwater fee within 30 days of it becoming due, the owner or operator shall be liable to the groundwater sustainability agency for interest at the rate of 1 percent per month on the delinquent amount of the groundwater fee and a 10-percent penalty.

(c) The groundwater sustainability agency may bring a suit in the court having jurisdiction against any owner or operator of a
 groundwater extraction facility within the area covered by the plan for the collection of any delinquent groundwater fees, interest, or penalties imposed under this chapter. If the groundwater sustainability agency seeks an attachment against the property of any named defendant in the suit, the groundwater sustainability agency shall not be required to furnish a bond or other undertaking as provided in Title 6.5 (commencing with Section 481.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) In the alternative to bringing a suit pursuant to subdivision (c), a groundwater sustainability agency may collect any delinquent groundwater charge and any civil penalties and interest on the delinquent groundwater charge pursuant to the laws applicable to the local agency or, if a joint powers authority, to the entity designated pursuant to Section 6509 of the Government Code. The collection shall be in the same manner as it would be applicable to the
 collection of delinquent assessments, water charges, or tolls.

(e) As an additional remedy, a groundwater sustainability agency, after a public hearing, may order an owner or operator to cease extraction of groundwater until all delinquent fees are paid. The groundwater sustainability agency shall give notice to the owner or operator by certified mail not less than 15 days in advance of the public hearing.

(f) The remedies specified in this section for collecting and enforcing fees are cumulative and may be pursued alternatively or may be used consecutively as determined by the governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 16.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10730.8.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall affect or interfere with the authority of a groundwater sustainability agency to levy and collect taxes, assessments, charges, and tolls as otherwise provided by law.

(b) Personal information included in a report or record pursuant to this chapter has the same protection from disclosure as is provided for information concerning utility customers of local agencies pursuant to Section 7927.410 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 431.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10731.

(a) Following an investigation pursuant to Section 10725.4, the governing body may make a determination fixing the amount of groundwater production from the groundwater extraction facility at an amount not to exceed the maximum production capacity of the facility for purposes of levying a groundwater charge. If a water-measuring device is permanently attached to the groundwater extraction facility, the record of production as disclosed by the water-measuring device shall be presumed to be accurate unless the contrary is established by the groundwater sustainability agency after investigation.

(b) After the governing body makes a determination fixing the amount of groundwater production pursuant to
 subdivision (a), a written notice of the determination shall be mailed to the owner or operator of the groundwater extraction facility at the address as shown by the groundwater sustainability agency’s records. A determination made by the governing body shall be conclusive on the owner or operator and the groundwater charges, based on the determination together with any interest and penalties, shall be payable immediately unless within 20 days after the mailing of the notice the owner or operator files with the governing body a written protest setting forth the ground for protesting the amount of production or the groundwater charges, interest, and penalties. If a protest is filed pursuant to this subdivision, the governing body shall hold a hearing to determine the total amount of the groundwater production and the groundwater charges, interest, and penalties. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to each protestant at least 20 days before the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of the determination of the
 governing body hearing shall be mailed to each protestant. The owner or operator shall have 20 days from the date of mailing of the determination to pay the groundwater charges, interest, and penalties determined by the governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 16.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Groundwater Sustainability Agency Enforcement Powers [10732. - 10732.2.]

10732.

(a) (1) A person who extracts groundwater in excess of the amount that person is authorized to extract under a rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution adopted pursuant to Section 10725.2, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per acre-foot extracted in excess of the amount that person is authorized to extract. Liability under this subdivision is in addition to any liability imposed under paragraph (2) and any fee imposed for the extraction.

(2) A person who violates any rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution adopted pursuant to Section 10725.2 shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus one
 hundred dollars ($100) for each additional day on which the violation continues if the person fails to comply within 30 days after the local agency has notified the person of the violation.

(b) (1) A groundwater sustainability agency may bring an action in the superior court to determine whether a violation occurred and to impose a civil penalty described in subdivision (a).

(2) A groundwater sustainability agency may administratively impose a civil penalty described in subdivision (a) after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing.

 (3) In determining the amount of the penalty, the superior court or the groundwater sustainability agency shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature and persistence of the violation, the extent of the
 harm caused by the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs, and any corrective action taken by the violator.

(c) A penalty imposed pursuant to this section shall be paid to the groundwater sustainability agency and shall be expended solely for purposes of this part.

(d) Penalties imposed pursuant to this section are in addition to any civil penalty or criminal fine under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 17.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10732.2.

If a groundwater sustainability agency finds that a state entity is not working cooperatively regarding implementation of a groundwater sustainability plan, the groundwater sustainability agency may file notice with the board regarding its finding. The board shall notice proceedings to investigate the finding of the groundwater sustainability agency. If the board determines that the failure of the state entity to work cooperatively regarding implementation of a groundwater sustainability plan compromises the ability of the groundwater sustainability agency to implement the plan in a manner that will likely achieve the sustainability goal, the board may direct the state entity to cooperate in the implementation of the groundwater sustainability
 plan unless the state entity indicates its authority for not complying with a groundwater sustainability plan in the same manner as subdivision (f) of Section 10735.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 666, Sec. 6.   (AB 617)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. State Evaluation and Assessment [10733. - 10733.8.]

10733.

(a) The department shall periodically review the groundwater sustainability plans developed by groundwater sustainability agencies pursuant to this part to evaluate whether a plan conforms with Sections 10727.2 and 10727.4 and is likely to achieve the sustainability goal for the basin covered by the groundwater sustainability plan.

(b) If a groundwater sustainability agency develops multiple groundwater sustainability plans for a basin, the department shall evaluate whether the plans conform with Sections 10727.2, 10727.4, and 10727.6 and are together likely to achieve the sustainability goal for the basin covered by the groundwater sustainability plans.

(c) The department shall evaluate whether a groundwater sustainability plan adversely affects the ability of an adjacent basin to implement their groundwater sustainability plan or impedes achievement of sustainability goals in an adjacent basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 18.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.2.

(a) (1) By June 1, 2016, the department shall adopt regulations for evaluating groundwater sustainability plans, the implementation of groundwater sustainability plans, and coordination agreements pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The regulations shall identify the necessary plan components specified in Sections 10727.2, 10727.4, and 10727.6 and other information that will assist local agencies in developing and implementing groundwater sustainability plans and coordination agreements.

(b) (1) The department may update the regulations, including to incorporate the best management practices identified pursuant to
 Section 10729.

(2) The regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall identify appropriate methodologies and assumptions for baseline conditions concerning hydrology, water demand, regulatory restrictions that affect the availability of surface water, and unreliability of, or reductions in, surface water deliveries to the agency or water users in the basin, and the impact of those conditions on achieving sustainability. The baseline for measuring unreliability and reductions shall include the historic average reliability and deliveries of surface water to the agency or water users in the basin.

(c) By June 1, 2016, the department shall adopt regulations for evaluating alternatives submitted pursuant to Section 10733.6.

(d) The department shall adopt the regulations, including any amendments
 thereto, authorized by this section as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall not be subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until revised by the department.

(e) Before adopting the regulations pursuant to this section, the department shall conduct three public meetings to consider public comments. The department shall publish the draft regulations on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. One meeting
 shall be conducted at a location in northern California, one meeting shall be conducted at a location in the central valley of California, and one meeting shall be conducted at a location in southern California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 13.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.4.

(a) Upon adoption of a groundwater sustainability plan, a groundwater sustainability agency shall submit the groundwater sustainability plan to the department for review pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If groundwater sustainability agencies develop multiple groundwater sustainability plans for a basin, the submission required by subdivision (a) shall not occur until the entire basin is covered by groundwater sustainability plans. When the entire basin is covered by groundwater sustainability plans, the groundwater sustainability agencies shall jointly submit to the department all of the following:

(1) The groundwater sustainability plans.

(2) An explanation of how the groundwater sustainability plans implemented together satisfy Sections 10727.2, 10727.4, and 10727.6 for the entire basin.

(3) A copy of the coordination agreement between the groundwater sustainability agencies to ensure the coordinated implementation of the groundwater sustainability plans for the entire basin.

(c) Upon receipt of a groundwater sustainability plan, the department shall post the plan on the department’s internet website and provide 60 days for persons to submit comments to the department about the plan.

(d) The department shall evaluate the
 groundwater sustainability plan within two years of its submission by a groundwater sustainability agency and issue an assessment of the plan. The assessment may include recommended corrective actions to address any deficiencies identified by the department.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a groundwater sustainability agency from implementing a groundwater sustainability plan prior to evaluation and assessment of the groundwater sustainability plan by the department.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit groundwater sustainability agencies that have developed multiple groundwater sustainability plans for a basin from amending the coordination agreement following department issuance of an assessment of the plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.6.

(a) If a local agency believes that an alternative described in subdivision (b) satisfies the objectives of this part, the local agency may submit the alternative to the department for evaluation and assessment of whether the alternative satisfies the objectives of this part for the basin.

(b) An alternative is any of the following:

(1) A plan developed pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) or other law authorizing groundwater management.

(2) Management pursuant to an adjudication action.

(3) An analysis of basin conditions that demonstrates that the basin has operated within its sustainable yield over a period of at least 10 years. The submission of an alternative described by this paragraph shall include a report prepared by a registered professional engineer or geologist who is licensed by the state and submitted under that engineer’s or geologist’s seal.

(c) A local agency shall submit an alternative pursuant to this section no later than January 1, 2017, and every five years thereafter.

(d) The assessment required by subdivision (a) shall include an assessment of whether the alternative is within a basin that is in compliance with Part 2.11 (commencing with Section 10920). If the alternative is within a basin that is not in compliance with Part 2.11 (commencing with Section 10920), the department shall find the alternative does not satisfy the
 objectives of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 18.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.8.

At least every five years after initial submission of a plan pursuant to Section 10733.4, the department shall review any available groundwater sustainability plan or alternative submitted in accordance with Section 10733.6, and the implementation of the corresponding groundwater sustainability program for consistency with this part, including achieving the sustainability goal. The department shall issue an assessment for each basin for which a plan or alternative has been submitted in accordance with this chapter, with an emphasis on assessing progress in achieving the sustainability goal within the basin. The assessment may include recommended corrective actions to address any deficiencies identified by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 18.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. State Intervention [10735. - 10736.6.]

10735.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Condition of long-term overdraft” means the condition of a groundwater basin where the average annual amount of water extracted for a long-term period, generally 10 years or more, exceeds the long-term average annual supply of water to the basin, plus any temporary surplus. Overdraft during a period of drought is not sufficient to establish a condition of long-term overdraft if extractions and recharge are managed as necessary to ensure that reductions in groundwater levels or storage during a period of drought are offset by increases in groundwater levels or storage during other periods.

(b) “Person” means any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business, trust, corporation, limited liability company, or public agency, including any city, county, city and county, district, joint powers authority, state, or any agency or department of those entities. “Person” includes, to the extent authorized by federal or tribal law and subject to the limitations described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 10720.3, the United States, a department, agency or instrumentality of the federal government, an Indian tribe, an authorized Indian tribal organization, or interstate body.

(c) “Probationary basin” means a basin for which the board has issued a determination under Section 10735.2.

(d) “Significant depletions of interconnected surface waters” means reductions in flow or levels of surface water that is hydrologically connected to the basin
 such that the reduced surface water flow or levels have a significant and unreasonable adverse impact on beneficial uses of the surface water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 19.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10735.2.

(a) The board, after notice and a public hearing, may designate a high- or medium-priority basin as a probationary basin, if the board finds one or more of the following applies to the basin:

(1) After June 30, 2017, none of the following have occurred:

(A) A local agency has decided to become a groundwater sustainability agency that intends to develop a groundwater sustainability plan for the entire basin.

(B) A collection of local agencies has formed a groundwater sustainability agency or prepared agreements to develop one or more groundwater sustainability plans that will collectively
 serve as a groundwater sustainability plan for the entire basin.

(C) A local agency has submitted an alternative that has been approved or is pending approval pursuant to Section 10733.6. If the department disapproves an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6, the board shall not act under this paragraph until at least 180 days after the department disapproved the alternative.

(2) The basin is subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7, and after January 31, 2020, none of the following have occurred:

(A) A groundwater sustainability agency has adopted a groundwater sustainability plan for the entire basin.

(B) A collection of local agencies has adopted groundwater sustainability plans that collectively serve as a groundwater
 sustainability plan for the entire basin.

(C) The department has approved an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6.

(3) The basin is subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7 and after January 31, 2020, the department, in consultation with the board, determines that a groundwater sustainability plan is inadequate or that the groundwater sustainability program is not being implemented in a manner that will likely achieve the sustainability goal.

(4) The basin is subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7, and after January 31, 2022, none of the following have occurred:

(A) A groundwater sustainability agency has adopted a groundwater sustainability plan for the entire basin.

(B) A collection of local agencies has adopted groundwater sustainability plans that collectively serve as a groundwater sustainability plan for the entire basin.

(C) The department has approved an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6.

(5) The basin is subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7, and either of the following have occurred:

(A) After January 31, 2022, both of the following have occurred:

(i) The department, in consultation with the board, determines that a groundwater sustainability plan is inadequate or that the groundwater sustainability plan is not being implemented in a manner that will likely achieve the sustainability goal.

(ii) The board determines that the basin is in a condition of long-term overdraft.

(B) After January 31, 2025, both of the following have occurred:

(i) The department, in consultation with the board, determines that a groundwater sustainability plan is inadequate or that the groundwater sustainability plan is not being implemented in a manner that will likely achieve the sustainability goal.

(ii) The board determines that the basin is in a condition where groundwater extractions result in significant depletions of interconnected surface waters.

(b) In making the findings associated with paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (a), the department and board may rely on periodic assessments the
 department has prepared pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10733). The board may request that the department conduct additional assessments utilizing the regulations developed pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10733) and make determinations pursuant to this section. The board shall post on its Internet Web site and provide at least 30 days for the public to comment on any determinations provided by the department pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) (1)   The determination may exclude a class or category of extractions from the requirement for reporting pursuant to Part 5.2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 2 if those extractions are subject to a local plan or program that adequately manages groundwater within the portion of the basin to which that plan or program applies, or if those extractions are likely to have a minimal impact on basin withdrawals.

(2) The determination may require reporting of a class or category of extractions that would otherwise be exempt from reporting pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5202 if those extractions are likely to have a substantial impact on basin withdrawals or requiring reporting of those extractions is reasonably necessary to obtain information for purposes of this chapter.

(3) The determination may establish requirements for information required to be included in reports of groundwater extraction, for installation of measuring devices, or for use of a methodology, measuring device, or both, pursuant to Part 5.2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 2.

(4) The determination may modify the water year or reporting date for a report of groundwater extraction pursuant to Section 5202.

(d) If the board finds that litigation challenging the formation of a groundwater sustainability agency prevented its formation before July 1, 2017, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or prevented a groundwater sustainability program from being implemented in a manner likely to achieve the sustainability goal pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a), the board shall not designate a basin as a probationary basin for a period of time equal to the delay caused by the litigation.

(e) The board shall exclude from probationary status any portion of a basin for which a groundwater sustainability agency demonstrates compliance with the sustainability goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 15.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10735.4.

(a) If the board designates a basin as a probationary basin pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 10735.2, a local agency or groundwater sustainability agency shall have 180 days to remedy the deficiency. The board may appoint a mediator or other facilitator, after consultation with affected local agencies, to assist in resolving disputes, and identifying and implementing actions that will remedy the deficiency.

(b) After the 180-day period provided by subdivision (a), the board may provide additional time to remedy the deficiency if it finds that a local agency is making substantial progress toward remedying the deficiency.

(c) The board may develop an interim plan pursuant to Section 10735.8 for the probationary basin at the end of the period provided by subdivision (a) or any extension provided pursuant to subdivision (b), if the board, in consultation with the department, determines that a local agency has not remedied the deficiency that resulted in designating the basin as a probationary basin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 16.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10735.6.

(a) If the board designates a basin as a probationary basin pursuant to paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10735.2, the board shall identify the specific deficiencies and identify potential actions to address the deficiencies. The board may request the department to provide local agencies, within 90 days of the designation of a probationary basin, with technical recommendations to remedy the deficiencies.

(b) The board may develop an interim plan pursuant to Section 10735.8 for the probationary basin one year after the designation of the basin pursuant to paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10735.2, if the board, in consultation with the department, determines that a
 local agency has not remedied the deficiency that resulted in designating the basin a probationary basin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 17.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10735.8.

(a) The board, after notice and a public hearing, may adopt an interim plan for a probationary basin.

(b) The interim plan shall include all of the following:

(1) Identification of the actions that are necessary to correct a condition of long-term overdraft or a condition where groundwater extractions result in significant depletions of interconnected surface waters, including recommendations for appropriate action by any person.

(2) A time schedule for the actions to be taken.

(3) A description of the monitoring to be undertaken to determine
 effectiveness of the plan.

(c) The interim plan may include the following:

(1) Restrictions on groundwater extraction.

(2) A physical solution.

(3) Principles and guidelines for the administration of rights to surface waters that are connected to the basin.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the interim plan shall be consistent with water right priorities, subject to Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(e) The
 board shall include in its interim plan a groundwater sustainability plan, or any element of a plan, that the board finds complies with the sustainability goal for that portion of the basin or would help meet the sustainability goal for the basin. Where, in the judgment of the board, an adjudication action can be relied on as part of the interim plan, either throughout the basin or in an area within the basin, the board may rely on, or incorporate elements of, that adjudication into the interim plan adopted by the board.
